New Jersey, session 222, S2253.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Department of Health shall make any written or oral examination that is required for nursing assistant certification available in multiple languages including, at a minimum, English and Spanish. 2.  The New Jersey Board of Nursing shall make any written or oral examination that is required for homemaker-home health aide certification available in multiple languages including, at a minimum, English and Spanish. 3.  The Commissioner of Health and the New Jersey Board of Nursing may each adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), if necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month after enactment.